da: Understøttede spintyper: Backspin; Flad; Uden spin; Sidespin; Slice; Topspin; Underspin; Andet
ko: 지원 스핀 유형: 백스핀; 플랫; 무회전; 사이드스핀; 슬라이스; 탑스핀; 언더스핀; 기타
hu: Támogatott forgatási típusok: Alsó pörgetés; Lapos; Pörgés nélküli; Oldalpörgetés; Nyesés; Felső pörgetés; Alápörgetés; Egyéb
sk-SK: Podporované typy rotácie: Spätná rotácia; Priamy úder; Bez rotácie; Bočná rotácia; Čop; Horná rotácia; Spodná rotácia; Iné
tr: Desteklenen spin türleri: Geri spin; Düz; Spinsiz; Yan spin; Kesme; Üst spin; Alt spin; Diğer
zh-CN: 支持的自旋类型: 下旋; 平击; 不旋转; 侧旋; 切削; 上旋; 底旋; 其他
es: Tipos de giro admitidos: Backspin; Plano; Sin efecto; Sidespin; Slice; Topspin; Underspin; Otro
it: Tipi di rotazione supportati: Backspin; Piatto; Nessun effetto; Sidespin; Slice; Topspin; Underspin; Altro
ro-RO: Tipuri de rotații suportate: Backspin; Plat; Fără spin; Sidespin; Slice; Topspin; Underspin; Altele
fr: Types d’effets pris en charge: Backspin; Plat; Sans effet; Effet latéral; Slice; Topspin; Underspin; Autre
lt-LT: Palaikomi sukimosi tipai: Atgalinis sukimasis; Plokščias; Be sukimosi; Šoninis sukimasis; Pjautinis; Priekinis sukimasis; Apatinis sukimasis; Kita
nb: Støttede spinntyper: Underskru; Flat; Uten skru; Sideskru; Slice; Overskru; Underskru; Annet
ru: Поддерживаемые типы вращения: Обратное вращение; Плоское; Без вращения; Боковое вращение; Слайс; Топспин; Нижнее вращение; Другое
hr-HR: Podržane vrste vrtnje: Backspin; Ravno; Bez rotacije; Sidespin; Slice; Topspin; Underspin; Ostalo
zh-TW: 支援的旋轉類型: 倒旋; 平擊; 不旋轉; 側旋; 切削; 上旋; 下旋; 其他
vi: Các loại spin được hỗ trợ: Xoáy ngược; Không xoáy (Flat); Không xoáy; Xoáy ngang; Cắt bóng (Slice); Xoáy tới; Xoáy dưới; Khác
pt-BR: Tipos de spin compatíveis: Backspin; Plano; Sem efeito; Sidespin; Slice; Topspin; Underspin; Outros
en: Spin types supported: Backspin; Flat; No spin; Sidespin; Slice; Topspin; Underspin; Other
pt-PT: Tipos de rotação suportados: Backspin; Plano; Sem rotação; Sidespin; Slice; Topspin; Underspin; Outro
el: Υποστηριζόμενοι τύποι περιστροφής: Backspin; Flat; Χωρίς spin; Sidespin; Slice; Topspin; Underspin; Άλλο
de: Unterstützte Spin-Arten: Backspin; Flach; Kein Spin; Sidespin; Slice; Topspin; Underspin; Sonstige
th: ประเภทการหมุนที่รองรับ: แบ็คสปิน; แฟลต; ไม่มีสปิน; ไซด์สปิน; สไลซ์; ท็อปสปิน; อันเดอร์สปิน; อื่นๆ
sv: Spintyper som stöds: Backspinn; Platt; Utan spinn; Sidospinn; Slice; Toppspinn; Underspinn; Annat
sl-SI: Podprte vrste vrtenja: Spin nazaj; Ravno; Brez spina; Stranski spin; Podsekan udarec; Spin naprej; Underspin; Drugo
fi: Tuetut kierretyypit: Alakierre; Kierteetön; Ei kierrettä; Sivukierre; Alakierre/slice; Yläkierre; Alakierre; Muu
cs: Podporované typy otáčení: Spodní rotace; Přímý; Bez rotace; Boční rotace; Čop; Horní rotace; Spodní rotace; Jiné
nl: Spin types ondersteund: Backspin; Vlak; Geen spin; Sidespin; Slice; Topspin; Underspin; Overige
pl: Obsługiwane typy rotacji: Rotacja wsteczna; Płaskie; Brak rotacji; Rotacja boczna; Slajs; Topspin; Underspin; Inne
bg-BG: Поддържани видове въртене: Обратно въртене; Плоско; Без въртене; Странично въртене; Подсечено; Топспин; Долно въртене; Друго
ja: 対応スピンタイプ: バックスピン; フラット; ノースピン; サイドスピン; スライス; トップスピン; アンダースピン; その他